Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 13 Mount Hope Bridge Authority [Repealed.]

24-13-1 — 24-13-32.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3391, §§ 1-17 and 20; P.L. 1959, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 155; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 13, § 1, effective March 29, 2006; P.L. 2006, ch. 25, § 1, effective April 20, 2006.